Utah statutes.
13-5-11.   Proceedings -- Local cost surveys as evidence.

In any injunction proceedings or in the prosecution of any person as officer, director or agent, it shall be sufficient to allege and prove the unlawful intent of the person, firm or corporation for whom or for which he acts. Where a particular trade or industry of which the person, firm or corporation complained against is a member, has an established cost survey for the locality and vicinity in which the offense is committed, the said cost survey shall be deemed prima-facie evidence in proving the costs of the person, firm or corporation complained against within the provisions of this act, unless the person, firm or corporation shall have kept a continuous, accurate and comprehensive record of the cost of business of the person, firm or corporation, in which event said record may be introduced to rebut the cost survey.

